Idaho statutes. Title 6 ACTIONS IN PARTICULAR CASES
Chapter 34
CORONAVIRUS LIMITED IMMUNITY ACT

Section.

§ 6-3401. Short title. [Null and void, effective July 1, 2021.].

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Coronavirus Limited Immunity Act.”

§ 6-3402. Definitions. [Null and void, effective July 1, 2021.].

As used in this chapter:

“Coronavirus” means:

Severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2;

The disease caused by severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2; or

Any subsequently identified mutation, modification, or strain of coronavirus if the transmission of said virus among humans rises to the level of an epidemic or pandemic and qualifies for an emergency declaration under applicable Idaho law.

“Person” means any entity recognized in this state and shall include but not be limited to an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, association, church or religious organization, city, county, school district, college, university or other institution of higher education, or other unit of local government. However, “person” shall not include any Idaho public health district; the federal government or any of its agencies; the state of Idaho or any of its agencies, except colleges, universities, and other institutions of higher education; nor any foreign government or foreign jurisdiction.

§ 6-3403. Limited immunity from liability. [Null and void, effective July 1, 2021.].

Subject to the other provisions of this section, a person is immune from civil liability for damages or an injury resulting from exposure of an individual to coronavirus.

Immunity as described in this section shall not apply to acts or omissions that constitute an intentional tort or willful or reckless misconduct as defined in section 6-1601, Idaho Code.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to modify the application of title 72, Idaho Code, worker’s compensation and related laws of the industrial commission.

The immunity provided in this section is in addition to any other immunity protection that may apply in state or federal law.